Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-155
Copies of records or documents; furnish; cost.

Whenever numerous copies of the same records or documents are furnished or certified to by the Department of Insurance, the Director of Insurance may reduce such fees for copies or certifications thereto if he deems the total fees to be excessive; and he may, when he deems it in the public interest, furnish without charge to the various state insurance regulatory authorities and persons other than insurers, copies, certified copies, or certifications of all records, documents, or information requested.

Laws 1955, c. 168, § 11, p. 482;

Laws 1961, c. 210, § 2, p. 626.